Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2527
Reciprocal agreements; county personnel officer; cooperate with other governmental agencies.

(1) Any county subject to the County Civil Service Act may enter into reciprocal agreements, upon such terms as may be agreed upon, for the use of equipment, materials, facilities, and services with any public agency or body for purposes deemed of benefit to the county personnel system.

(2) The county personnel officer, with the approval of the board of county commissioners, may cooperate with other governmental agencies charged with public personnel administration in conducting personnel tests, recruiting personnel, training personnel, establishing lists from which eligible candidates shall be certified for appointment, and for the interchange of personnel and their benefits.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 19.